Maryland, session 2026, SB0096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7.5–210.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible individual” means:
(i) [An active] A service member;
(ii) A veteran;
(iii) The spouse of [an active] A service member or veteran;
(iv) A child of [an active] A service member or veteran; or
(v) A stepchild of [an active] A service member or veteran.
(3) “Program” means the Sheila E. Hixson Behavioral Health Services
Matching Grant Program for Service Members and Veterans.
– 1 –

Ch. 336 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) There is a Sheila E. Hixson Behavioral Health Services Matching Grant
Program for Service Members and Veterans.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to provide funds to local nonprofit
organizations to establish and expand community behavioral health programs to serve
[active] service members, veterans, and their families.
(e) (1) To be eligible for a grant from the Program, a nonprofit organization
must have a mission to:
(i) Provide behavioral health services; or
(ii) Provide services to [active] service members, veterans, or their
families.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –